Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-470.01
Impoundment of operator's license, defined.

Impoundment of operator's license shall mean the seizure and holding of a person's operator's license by the court pursuant to a court order requiring such person not to operate a motor vehicle for a specified period of time when the court has not ordered a revocation of the operator's license.

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 7.